Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.150

Successors in interest.

The obligations of any supplier under this chapter are applied to any successor in interest or assignee of the supplier. A successor in interest includes any purchaser of assets or stock, any surviving corporation resulting from merger or liquidation, and any receiver or any trustee of the original supplier.

[ 1990 c 124 s 6.]